Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-425
Actions by partnership and partners.

(1) A partnership may maintain an action against a partner for a breach of the partnership agreement, or for the violation of a duty to the partnership, causing harm to the partnership.

(2) A partner may maintain an action against the partnership or another partner for legal or equitable relief, with or without an accounting as to partnership business, to:

(a) Enforce the partner's rights under the partnership agreement;

(b) Enforce the partner's rights under the Uniform Partnership Act of 1998, including:

(i) The partner's rights under section 67-421, 67-423, or 67-424;

(ii) The partner's right on dissociation to have the partner's interest in the partnership purchased pursuant to section 67-434 or enforce any other right under sections 67-431 to 67-433 or 67-434 to 67-438; or

(iii) The partner's right to compel a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business under section 67-439 or enforce any other right under sections 67-439 to 67-445; or

(c) Enforce the rights and otherwise protect the interests of the partner, including rights and interests arising independently of the partnership relationship.

(3) The accrual of, and any time limitation on, a right of action for a remedy under this section is governed by other law. A right to an accounting upon a dissolution and winding up does not revive a claim barred by law.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 25.